Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.203

Form of execution—Form of execution against principal and surety, after expiration of stay of execution.

FORM OF EXECUTION

State of Washington,

County of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .,











ss.

To the sheriff or any constable of said county:

Whereas, judgment against C D, for the sum of . . . . . . . . . dollars, and . . . . . . . . . dollars cost of suit, was recovered on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., before the undersigned, one of the justices of the peace in and for said county, at the suit of A B. These are, therefore, in the name of the state of Washington, to command you to levy on the goods and chattels of the said C D (excepting such as the law exempts), and make sale thereof according to law, to the amount of said sum and costs upon this writ, and the same return to me within thirty days, to be rendered to the said A B, for his or her debt, interests and costs.

Given under my hand this . . . . day of . . . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

J. P., Justice of the Peace.

FORM OF EXECUTION AGAINST PRINCIPAL

AND SURETY, AFTER EXPIRATION OF

STAY OF EXECUTION

State of Washington,

County of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .,











ss.

To the sheriff or any constable of said county:

Whereas, judgment against C D for the sum of . . . . . . . . . dollars, and for . . . . . . . . . dollars, costs of suit, was recovered on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., before the undersigned, one of the justices of the peace in and for said county, at the suit of A B; and whereas, on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., E F became surety to pay said judgment and costs, in . . . . . . month from the date of the judgment aforesaid, agreeably to law, in the payment of which said C D and E F have failed; these are, therefore, in the name, etc., [as in the common form].

[ 2016 c 202 s 14; 2010 c 8 s 3015; 1957 c 89 s 5. Prior: Code 1881 s 1895, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]